Maryland, session 2026, SB0540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions Criminal Procedure
20–702. 5–210.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AGENT” MEANS A PERSON THAT ACTS OR IS
AUTHORIZED TO ACT AS THE REPRESENTATIVE OF A PRIVATE HOME DETENTION
MONITORING AGENCY “PRIVATE HOME DETENTION MONITORING AGENCY” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 20–101 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS
ARTICLE.
(B) ON THE GROUNDS OF A COURTHOUSE OR CORRECTIONAL FACILITY, A
PRIVATE HOME DETENTION MONITORING AGENCY, AN AGENT OF A PRIVATE HOME
DETENTION MONITORING AGENCY, AN EMPLOYEE OF THE COURTHOUSE, OR AN
EMPLOYEE OF A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY MAY NOT:
(1) APPROACH, ENTICE, OR INVITE A PERSON TO USE THE SERVICES
OF A SPECIFIC PRIVATE HOME DETENTION MONITORING AGENCY;
(2) DISTRIBUTE, DISPLAY, OR WEAR AN ITEM THAT ADVERTISES THE
SERVICES OF A PRIVATE HOME DETENTION MONITORING AGENCY; OR
(3) OTHERWISE SOLICIT BUSINESS FOR A PRIVATE HOME DETENTION
MONITORING AGENCY.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS GUILTY
OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,500 AND, IF LICENSED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE TITLE 20 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND
PROFESSIONS ARTICLE, A 30–DAY LICENSE SUSPENSION FOR A FIRST OFFENSE;
AND
(2) A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 AND, IF LICENSED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE TITLE 20 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND
PROFESSIONS ARTICLE, A 90–DAY LICENSE SUSPENSION FOR A SUBSEQUENT
OFFENSE.
(D) A PERSON LICENSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE TITLE 20 OF
THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE THAT IS CONVICTED OF

SENATE BILL 540 3
A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE REFERRED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES FOR APPROPRIATE ACTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.